Illinois, session 104th, SB2117.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Innovation and Technology Act 5is amended by changing Section 1-80 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1370/1-80)7    Sec. 1-80. Generative AI and Natural Language Processing 8Task Force.9    (a) As used in this Section, "Task Force" means the 10Generative AI and Natural Language Processing Task Force 11established by this Section.12    (b) The Department shall establish the Generative AI and 13Natural Language Processing Task Force. The Task Force shall 14investigate and provide a report on generative artificial 15intelligence software and natural language processing 16software.17    (c) The Task Force shall be composed of all of the 18following members:19        (1) One member appointed by the Speaker of the House 20    of Representatives, who shall serve as a co-chairperson.21        (2) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 22    House of Representatives.23        (3) One member appointed by the President of the   SB2117- 2 -LRB104 09730 BDA 19796 b1    Senate, who shall serve as a co-chairperson.2        (4) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 3    Senate.4        (5) The Secretary of Innovation and Technology or his 5    or her designee.6        (6) The State Superintendent of Education or his or 7    her designee.8        (7) The Executive Director of the Illinois Community 9    College Board or his or her designee.10        (8) The Executive Director of the Board of Higher 11    Education or his or her designee.12        (9) Two teachers recommended by a statewide 13    association representing teachers, appointed by the 14    Governor.15        (10) Two principals recommended by a statewide 16    principals association, appointed by the Governor.17        (11) Two experts on cybersecurity, appointed by the 18    Governor.19        (12) Two experts on artificial intelligence, appointed 20    by the Governor.21        (13) Two members of statewide business associations, 22    appointed by the Governor.23        (14) The Statewide Chief Information Security Officer 24    or his or her designee.25        (15) Two members of statewide labor associations, 26    appointed by the Governor.  SB2117- 3 -LRB104 09730 BDA 19796 b1        (16) The Attorney General or his or her designee. 2        (17) The Chief Procurement Officer for General 3    Services or his or her designee. 4    (d) The Task Force shall hold at least 5 public meetings in 5a hybrid format, with both virtual and in-person options to 6attend. Of those required 5 meetings, one shall be held in each 7of the following locations:8        (1) Chicago;9        (2) Springfield;10        (3) the Metro East region;11        (4) the Quad Cities region; and12        (5) Southern Illinois. 13    (e) The responsibilities of the Task Force shall include 14all of the following:15        (1) recommending legislation or regulations to protect 16    consumer information as it relates to generative 17    artificial intelligence;18        (2) recommending model policies for schools to address 19    the use of generative artificial intelligence by students 20    in the classroom;21        (3) assessing the use of generative artificial 22    intelligence to improve delivery of public services;23        (4) protecting civil rights and civil liberties of 24    individuals and consumers as it relates to generative 25    artificial intelligence;26        (5) assessing the use of generative artificial   SB2117- 4 -LRB104 09730 BDA 19796 b1    intelligence in the workforce and how this could affect 2    employment levels, types of employment, and the deployment 3    of workers;4        (6) assessing the challenges of generative artificial 5    intelligence for cybersecurity; and6        (7) recommending policies and procedures concerning 7    the procurement, deployment, and use by State agencies of 8    systems that employ generative artificial intelligence; 9        (8) recommending policies and procedures concerning 10    uses by State agencies of generative artificial 11    intelligence that should be prohibited;12        (9) assessing the use of generative artificial 13    intelligence by State agencies on the provision of State 14    services; and 15        (10) (7) other topics related to generative artificial 16    intelligence software and natural language processing 17    software that may arise from testimony or reports to the 18    Task Force submitted by its members or the public. 19    (f) The Department shall provide administrative and 20technical support to the Task Force.21    (g) The Task Force shall file a report by December 31, 2024 22with the Governor and the General Assembly covering the Task 23Force's investigation into generative artificial intelligence 24software and natural language processing software and the Task 25Force's responsibilities under subsection (e). The Task Force 26shall file an addendum to its report by December 31, 2026 with   SB2117- 5 -LRB104 09730 BDA 19796 b1the Governor and the General Assembly covering the same 2topics, including the responsibilities under subsection (e) 3added by this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 4(Source: P.A. 103-451, eff. 8-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.